District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.28

Exceptions.

(a)

A person need not register with the Director pursuant to § 1-1162.29 if the person is:

(1)

A public official, or an employee of the United States acting in his or her official capacity;

(2)

A publisher or working member of the press, radio, or television who, in the ordinary course of business, disseminates news or editorial comment to the general public;

(3)

A candidate, member, or member-elect of an Advisory Neighborhood Commission; or

(4)

An entity specified in § 47-1802.01(4), whose activities do not consist of lobbying, the result of which shall inure to the financial gain or benefit of the entity.

(b)

Any person who is exempt from registration under any provision of this section, except a person exempt from registration under the provisions of subsection (a)(1) of this section, may be a registrant for other purposes under this part; provided, that no activity engaged in by the person shall constitute a conflict of interest under the provisions of § 1-1162.23. Registrants have no obligation to report activities in furtherance of exempt activities under this section in activity reports required under § 1-1162.30.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 228, 59 DCR 1862
This section is referenced in § 1-1162.27 and § 1-1162.31.